Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-143
Credential to engage in business; renewal; procedure; notice of expiration.

(1) The credential to engage in a business shall be renewed biennially upon request of the credentialed business and completion of the renewal requirements. The renewals provided for in this section shall be accomplished in such manner and on such date as the department, with the recommendation of the appropriate board, may establish. The request for renewal shall include all information required by the department and shall be accompanied by the renewal fee. Such fee shall be paid not later than the date of the expiration of such credential.

(2) At least thirty days before the expiration of a credential, the department shall notify each credentialed business at its last address of record. If a credentialed business fails to meet the renewal requirements on or before the date of expiration of the credential, the credential shall expire. When a credential expires, the right to operate the business shall terminate. A business which fails to renew its credential by the expiration date shall apply for and obtain another credential prior to operating the business.

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 15;

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-110.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 43.